Wisconsin, session 2025, AB712.
do enact as follows:AB712,11Section 1. 77.51 (9) (e) of the statutes is renumbered 77.51 (9) (e) (intro.) and 2amended to read:AB712,2,12377.51 (9) (e) (intro.) Five or fewer auctions auction events that are the sale of 4personal farm property or household goods and that are held by the same 5auctioneer at the same location during the year. For purposes of this paragraph, an 6auction event is the total number of consecutive days for which property at that 7location is available for bidding. With respect to an auction for which all or some of 8the bids may be submitted over the Internet, an auction event is the total number of 9consecutive days that winning bids are selected, regardless of whether the property 10being sold is at multiple locations. In this paragraph, with respect to indoor 11locations, “location” means a building, except that in the case of a shopping center or 12a shopping mall “location” means a store.:AB712,213Section 2. 77.51 (9) (e) 1. and 2. of the statutes are created to read:AB712,2,161477.51 (9) (e) 1. “Auctioneer” means a person, including an auction company as 15defined in s. 480.01 (2), that is licensed to conduct an auction under the laws of this 16state.AB712,2,20172. “Location” means the building or street address where the property to be 18auctioned is physically located at the time of the auction and where the auction is 19being held. With respect to a shopping center or shopping mall, “location” means a 20store.AB712,321Section 3. Effective date.AB712,3,21(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 3rd month beginning after 2publication.AB712,3,33